Washington statutes.
RCW 9.40.105

Tampering with fire alarm or firefighting equipment—Intent to commit arson—Penalty.

Any person who willfully and without cause tampers with, molests, injures, or breaks any public or private fire alarm apparatus, emergency phone, radio, or other wire or signal, or any firefighting equipment with the intent to commit arson, is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2003 c 53 s 24.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.